Missouri, session 2026, SB1779.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Sections 169.070 and 169.670, RSMo, are
2 repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
3 known as sections 169.070 and 169.670, to read as follows:
1 169.070. 1. The retirement allowance of a member
2 whose age at retirement is sixty years or more and whose
3 creditable service is five years or more, or whose sum of
4 age and creditable service equals eighty years or more, or
5 who has attained age fifty-five and whose creditable service
6 is twenty-five years or more or whose creditable service is
7 thirty years or more regardless of age, may be the sum of
8 the following items, not to exceed one hundred percent of
9 the member's final average salary:
10 (1) Two and five-tenths percent of the member's final
11 average salary for each year of membership service;
12 (2) Six-tenths of the amount payable for a year of
13 membership service for each year of prior service not
14 exceeding thirty years.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1779 2
15 In lieu of the retirement allowance otherwise provided in
16 subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, a member may
17 elect to receive a retirement allowance of:
18 (3) Two and four-tenths percent of the member's final
19 average salary for each year of membership service, if the
20 member's creditable service is twenty-nine years or more but
21 less than thirty years, and the member has not attained age
22 fifty-five;
23 (4) Two and thirty-five-hundredths percent of the
24 member's final average salary for each year of membership
25 service, if the member's creditable service is twenty-eight
26 years or more but less than twenty-nine years, and the
27 member has not attained age fifty-five;
28 (5) Two and three-tenths percent of the member's final
29 average salary for each year of membership service, if the
30 member's creditable service is twenty-seven years or more
31 but less than twenty-eight years, and the member has not
32 attained age fifty-five;
33 (6) Two and twenty-five-hundredths percent of the
34 member's final average salary for each year of membership
35 service, if the member's creditable service is twenty-six
36 years or more but less than twenty-seven years, and the
37 member has not attained age fifty-five;
38 (7) Two and two-tenths percent of the member's final
39 average salary for each year of membership service, if the
40 member's creditable service is twenty-five years or more but
41 less than twenty-six years, and the member has not attained
42 age fifty-five;
43 (8) Two and fifty-five hundredths percent of the
44 member's final average salary for each year of membership
45 service, if the member's creditable service is thirty-two
46 years or more regardless of age.

SB 1779 3
47 2. In lieu of the retirement allowance provided in
48 subsection 1 of this section, a member whose age is sixty
49 years or more on September 28, 1975, may elect to have the
50 member's retirement allowance calculated as a sum of the
51 following items:
52 (1) Sixty cents plus one and five-tenths percent of
53 the member's final average salary for each year of
54 membership service;
55 (2) Six-tenths of the amount payable for a year of
56 membership service for each year of prior service not
57 exceeding thirty years;
58 (3) Three-fourths of one percent of the sum of
59 subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection for each month
60 of attained age in excess of sixty years but not in excess
61 of age sixty-five.
62 3. (1) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided
63 either in subsection 1 or 2 of this section, collectively
64 called "option 1", a member whose creditable service is
65 twenty-five years or more or who has attained the age of
66 fifty-five with five or more years of creditable service may
67 elect in the member's application for retirement to receive
68 the actuarial equivalent of the member's retirement
69 allowance in reduced monthly payments for life during
70 retirement with the provision that:
71 Option 2.
72 Upon the member's death the reduced retirement
73 allowance shall be continued throughout the life of and paid
74 to such person as has an insurable interest in the life of
75 the member as the member shall have nominated in the
76 member's election of the option, and provided further that
77 if the person so nominated dies before the retired member,
78 the retirement allowance will be increased to the amount the

SB 1779 4
79 retired member would be receiving had the retired member
80 elected option 1; or
81 Option 3.
82 Upon the death of the member three-fourths of the
83 reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout
84 the life of and paid to such person as has an insurable
85 interest in the life of the member and as the member shall
86 have nominated in an election of the option, and provided
87 further that if the person so nominated dies before the
88 retired member, the retirement allowance will be increased
89 to the amount the retired member would be receiving had the
90 member elected option 1; or
91 Option 4.
92 Upon the death of the member one-half of the reduced
93 retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life
94 of, and paid to, such person as has an insurable interest in
95 the life of the member and as the member shall have
96 nominated in an election of the option, and provided further
97 that if the person so nominated dies before the retired
98 member, the retirement allowance shall be increased to the
99 amount the retired member would be receiving had the member
100 elected option 1; or
101 Option 5.
102 Upon the death of the member prior to the member having
103 received one hundred twenty monthly payments of the member's
104 reduced allowance, the remainder of the one hundred twenty
105 monthly payments of the reduced allowance shall be paid to
106 such beneficiary as the member shall have nominated in the
107 member's election of the option or in a subsequent
108 nomination. If there is no beneficiary so nominated who
109 survives the member for the remainder of the one hundred
110 twenty monthly payments, the total of the remainder of such

SB 1779 5
111 one hundred twenty monthly payments shall be paid to the
112 surviving spouse, surviving children in equal shares,
113 surviving parents in equal shares, or estate of the last
114 person, in that order of precedence, to receive a monthly
115 allowance in a lump sum payment. If the total of the one
116 hundred twenty payments paid to the retired individual and
117 the beneficiary of the retired individual is less than the
118 total of the member's accumulated contributions, the
119 difference shall be paid to the beneficiary in a lump sum; or
120 Option 6.
121 Upon the death of the member prior to the member having
122 received sixty monthly payments of the member's reduced
123 allowance, the remainder of the sixty monthly payments of
124 the reduced allowance shall be paid to such beneficiary as
125 the member shall have nominated in the member's election of
126 the option or in a subsequent nomination. If there is no
127 beneficiary so nominated who survives the member for the
128 remainder of the sixty monthly payments, the total of the
129 remainder of such sixty monthly payments shall be paid to
130 the surviving spouse, surviving children in equal shares,
131 surviving parents in equal shares, or estate of the last
132 person, in that order of precedence, to receive a monthly
133 allowance in a lump sum payment. If the total of the sixty
134 payments paid to the retired individual and the beneficiary
135 of the retired individual is less than the total of the
136 member's accumulated contributions, the difference shall be
137 paid to the beneficiary in a lump sum.
138 (2) The election of an option may be made only in the
139 application for retirement and such application must be
140 filed prior to the date on which the retirement of the
141 member is to be effective. If either the member or the
142 person nominated to receive the survivorship payments dies

SB 1779 6
143 before the effective date of retirement, the option shall
144 not be effective, provided that:
145 (a) If the member or a person retired on disability
146 retirement dies after acquiring twenty-five or more years of
147 creditable service or after attaining the age of fifty-five
148 years and acquiring five or more years of creditable service
149 and before retirement, except retirement with disability
150 benefits, and the person named by the member as the member's
151 beneficiary has an insurable interest in the life of the
152 deceased member, the designated beneficiary may elect to
153 receive either survivorship benefits under option 2 or a
154 payment of the accumulated contributions of the member. If
155 survivorship benefits under option 2 are elected and the
156 member at the time of death would have been eligible to
157 receive an actuarial equivalent of the member's retirement
158 allowance, the designated beneficiary may further elect to
159 defer the option 2 payments until the date the member would
160 have been eligible to receive the retirement allowance
161 provided in subsection 1 or 2 of this section;
162 (b) If the member or a person retired on disability
163 retirement dies before attaining age fifty-five but after
164 acquiring five but fewer than twenty-five years of
165 creditable service, and the person named as the member's
166 beneficiary has an insurable interest in the life of the
167 deceased member, the designated beneficiary may elect to
168 receive either a payment of the member's accumulated
169 contributions, or survivorship benefits under option 2 to
170 begin on the date the member would first have been eligible
171 to receive an actuarial equivalent of the member's
172 retirement allowance, or to begin on the date the member
173 would first have been eligible to receive the retirement
174 allowance provided in subsection 1 or 2 of this section.

SB 1779 7
175 4. If the total of the retirement or disability
176 allowance paid to an individual before the death of the
177 individual is less than the accumulated contributions at the
178 time of retirement, the difference shall be paid to the
179 beneficiary of the individual, or to the surviving spouse,
180 surviving children in equal shares, surviving parents in
181 equal shares, or estate of the individual in that order of
182 precedence. If an optional benefit as provided in option 2,
183 3 or 4 in subsection 3 of this section had been elected, and
184 the beneficiary dies after receiving the optional benefit,
185 and if the total retirement allowance paid to the retired
186 individual and the beneficiary of the retired individual is
187 less than the total of the contributions, the difference
188 shall be paid to the surviving spouse, surviving children in
189 equal shares, surviving parents in equal shares, or estate
190 of the beneficiary, in that order of precedence, unless the
191 retired individual designates a different recipient with the
192 board at or after retirement.
193 5. If a member dies and his or her financial
194 institution is unable to accept the final payment or
195 payments due to the member, the final payment or payments
196 shall be paid to the beneficiary of the member or, if there
197 is no beneficiary, to the surviving spouse, surviving
198 children in equal shares, surviving parents in equal shares,
199 or estate of the member, in that order of precedence, unless
200 otherwise stated. If the beneficiary of a deceased member
201 dies and his or her financial institution is unable to
202 accept the final payment or payments, the final payment or
203 payments shall be paid to the surviving spouse, surviving
204 children in equal shares, surviving parents in equal shares,
205 or estate of the member, in that order of precedence, unless
206 otherwise stated.

SB 1779 8
207 6. If a member dies before receiving a retirement
208 allowance, the member's accumulated contributions at the
209 time of the death of the member shall be paid to the
210 beneficiary of the member or, if there is no beneficiary, to
211 the surviving spouse, surviving children in equal shares,
212 surviving parents in equal shares, or to the estate of the
213 member, in that order of precedence; except that, no such
214 payment shall be made if the beneficiary elects option 2 in
215 subsection 3 of this section, unless the beneficiary dies
216 before having received benefits pursuant to that subsection
217 equal to the accumulated contributions of the member, in
218 which case the amount of accumulated contributions in excess
219 of the total benefits paid pursuant to that subsection shall
220 be paid to the surviving spouse, surviving children in equal
221 shares, surviving parents in equal shares, or estate of the
222 beneficiary, in that order of precedence.
223 7. If a member ceases to be a public school employee
224 as herein defined and certifies to the board of trustees
225 that such cessation is permanent, or if the membership of
226 the person is otherwise terminated, the member shall be paid
227 the member's accumulated contributions with interest.
228 8. Notwithstanding any provisions of sections 169.010
229 to 169.141 to the contrary, if a member ceases to be a
230 public school employee after acquiring five or more years of
231 membership service in Missouri, the member may at the option
232 of the member leave the member's contributions with the
233 retirement system and claim a retirement allowance any time
234 after reaching the minimum age for voluntary retirement.
235 When the member's claim is presented to the board, the
236 member shall be granted an allowance as provided in sections
237 169.010 to 169.141 on the basis of the member's age, years
238 of service, and the provisions of the law in effect at the

SB 1779 9
239 time the member requests the member's retirement to become
240 effective.
241 9. The retirement allowance of a member retired
242 because of disability shall be nine-tenths of the allowance
243 to which the member's creditable service would entitle the
244 member if the member's age were sixty, or fifty percent of
245 one-twelfth of the annual salary rate used in determining
246 the member's contributions during the last school year for
247 which the member received a year of creditable service
248 immediately prior to the member's disability, whichever is
249 greater, except that no such allowance shall exceed the
250 retirement allowance to which the member would have been
251 entitled upon retirement at age sixty if the member had
252 continued to teach from the date of disability until age
253 sixty at the same salary rate.
254 10. Notwithstanding any provisions of sections 169.010
255 to 169.141 to the contrary, from October 13, 1961, the
256 contribution rate pursuant to sections 169.010 to 169.141
257 shall be multiplied by the factor of two-thirds for any
258 member of the system for whom federal Old Age and Survivors
259 Insurance tax is paid from state or local tax funds on
260 account of the member's employment entitling the person to
261 membership in the system. The monetary benefits for a
262 member who elected not to exercise an option to pay into the
263 system a retroactive contribution of four percent on that
264 part of the member's annual salary rate which was in excess
265 of four thousand eight hundred dollars but not in excess of
266 eight thousand four hundred dollars for each year of
267 employment in a position covered by this system between July
268 1, 1957, and July 1, 1961, as provided in subsection 10 of
269 this section as it appears in RSMo, 1969, shall be the sum
270 of:

SB 1779 10
271 (1) For years of service prior to July 1, 1946, six-
272 tenths of the full amount payable for years of membership
273 service;
274 (2) For years of membership service after July 1,
275 1946, in which the full contribution rate was paid, full
276 benefits under the formula in effect at the time of the
277 member's retirement;
278 (3) For years of membership service after July 1,
279 1957, and prior to July 1, 1961, the benefits provided in
280 this section as it appears in RSMo, 1959; except that if the
281 member has at least thirty years of creditable service at
282 retirement the member shall receive the benefit payable
283 pursuant to that section as though the member's age were
284 sixty-five at retirement;
285 (4) For years of membership service after July 1,
286 1961, in which the two-thirds contribution rate was paid,
287 two-thirds of the benefits under the formula in effect at
288 the time of the member's retirement.
289 11. The monetary benefits for each other member for
290 whom federal Old Age and Survivors Insurance tax is or was
291 paid at any time from state or local funds on account of the
292 member's employment entitling the member to membership in
293 the system shall be the sum of:
294 (1) For years of service prior to July 1, 1946, six-
295 tenths of the full amount payable for years of membership
296 service;
297 (2) For years of membership service after July 1,
298 1946, in which the full contribution rate was paid, full
299 benefits under the formula in effect at the time of the
300 member's retirement;
301 (3) For years of membership service after July 1,
302 1957, in which the two-thirds contribution rate was paid,

SB 1779 11
303 two-thirds of the benefits under the formula in effect at
304 the time of the member's retirement.
305 12. Any retired member of the system who was retired
306 prior to September 1, 1972, or beneficiary receiving
307 payments under option 1 or option 2 of subsection 3 of this
308 section, as such option existed prior to September 1, 1972,
309 will be eligible to receive an increase in the retirement
310 allowance of the member of two percent for each year, or
311 major fraction of more than one-half of a year, which the
312 retired member has been retired prior to July 1, 1975. This
313 increased amount shall be payable commencing with January,
314 1976, and shall thereafter be referred to as the member's
315 retirement allowance. The increase provided for in this
316 subsection shall not affect the retired member's eligibility
317 for compensation provided for in section [169.580 or]
318 169.585, nor shall the amount being paid pursuant to these
319 sections be reduced because of any increases provided for in
320 this section.
321 13. (1) If the board of trustees determines that the
322 cost of living, as measured by generally accepted standards,
323 increases two percent or more in the preceding fiscal year,
324 the board shall increase the retirement allowances which the
325 retired members or beneficiaries are receiving by two
326 percent of the amount being received by the retired member
327 or the beneficiary at the time the annual increase is
328 granted by the board with the provision that the increases
329 provided for in this subsection shall not become effective
330 until the fourth January first following the member's
331 retirement or January 1, 1977, whichever later occurs, or in
332 the case of any member retiring on or after July 1, 2000,
333 the increase provided for in this subsection shall not
334 become effective until the third January first following the

SB 1779 12
335 member's retirement, or in the case of any member retiring
336 on or after July 1, 2001, the increase provided for in this
337 subsection shall not become effective until the second
338 January first following the member's retirement. Commencing
339 with January 1, 1992, if the board of trustees determines
340 that the cost of living has increased five percent or more
341 in the preceding fiscal year, the board shall increase the
342 retirement allowances by five percent. The total of the
343 increases granted to a retired member or the beneficiary
344 after December 31, 1976, may not exceed eighty percent of
345 the retirement allowance established at retirement or as
346 previously adjusted by other subsections.
347 (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
348 chapter to the contrary, the limitation on the total of the
349 increases granted to a retired member or beneficiary as
350 provided by subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
351 subject to an annual increase approved by the board of
352 trustees beginning on December 31, 2026, and on each
353 December thirty-first thereafter, except that such annual
354 increase shall not exceed two percent per year. Any
355 increase to the limitation shall depend on the performance
356 of the system's investments. If the system's investments
357 earn two percent or greater returns in excess of the
358 investment return rate adopted by the board of trustees in
359 the immediately prior fiscal year, the percentage of the
360 retirement allowance for the total of increases granted to a
361 retired member or beneficiary shall be increased by two
362 percent. The two percent increase shall be incorporated in
363 the calculation applicable to the retirement allowances in
364 the calendar year that immediately follows the fiscal year
365 in which the system's investments met or exceeded by two
366 percent the investment return rate. The total of the

SB 1779 13
367 increases granted to a retired member or beneficiary shall
368 not exceed eighty percent of the retirement allowance
369 established at retirement or as previously adjusted by other
370 sections. If a retired member or beneficiary has already
371 reached the eighty percent cap under this subdivision, such
372 retired member or beneficiary shall be granted a two percent
373 cost of living adjustment for such year, but such increases
374 shall not be cumulative. In a year that the system's
375 investments fail to earn at least two percent returns in
376 excess of the investment return rate adopted by the board of
377 trustees in the immediately prior fiscal year, the retired
378 member or beneficiary that has already reached the eighty
379 percent cap under this subdivision shall not be granted a
380 cost of living adjustment for that year. The percentage of
381 the retirement allowance for the total of increases granted
382 to a retired member or beneficiary shall not be decreased.
383 Any reference to the limitation on the total of increases
384 granted to a retired member or beneficiary in any other
385 section of this chapter shall be construed to be the
386 percentage of the retirement allowance in effect as
387 increased pursuant to this subdivision unless such increase
388 to the percentage of the retirement allowance is otherwise
389 expressly excluded.
390 (3) If the cost of living increases less than five
391 percent, the board of trustees may determine the percentage
392 of increase to be made in retirement allowances, but at no
393 time can the increase exceed five percent per year. If the
394 cost of living decreases in a fiscal year, there will be no
395 increase in allowances for retired members on the following
396 January first.
397 14. The board of trustees may reduce the amounts which
398 have been granted as increases to a member pursuant to

SB 1779 14
399 subsection 13 of this section if the cost of living, as
400 determined by the board and as measured by generally
401 accepted standards, is less than the cost of living was at
402 the time of the first increase granted to the member; except
403 that, the reductions shall not exceed the amount of
404 increases which have been made to the member's allowance
405 after December 31, 1976.
406 15. Any application for retirement shall include a
407 sworn statement by the member certifying that the spouse of
408 the member at the time the application was completed was
409 aware of the application and the plan of retirement elected
410 in the application.
411 16. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
412 person retired prior to September 28, 1983, who is receiving
413 a reduced retirement allowance under option 1 or option 2 of
414 subsection 3 of this section, as such option existed prior
415 to September 28, 1983, and whose beneficiary nominated to
416 receive continued retirement allowance payments under the
417 elected option dies or has died, shall upon application to
418 the board of trustees have his or her retirement allowance
419 increased to the amount he or she would have been receiving
420 had the option not been elected, actuarially adjusted to
421 recognize any excessive benefits which would have been paid
422 to him or her up to the time of application.
423 17. Benefits paid pursuant to the provisions of the
424 public school retirement system of Missouri shall not exceed
425 the limitations of Section 415 of Title 26 of the United
426 States Code except as provided pursuant to this subsection.
427 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the board of
428 trustees may establish a benefit plan pursuant to Section
429 415(m) of Title 26 of the United States Code. Such plan
430 shall be created solely for the purpose described in Section

SB 1779 15
431 415(m)(3)(A) of Title 26 of the United States Code. The
432 board of trustees may promulgate regulations necessary to
433 implement the provisions of this subsection and to create
434 and administer such benefit plan.
435 18. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
436 contrary, any person retired before, on, or after May 26,
437 1994, shall be made, constituted, appointed and employed by
438 the board as a special consultant on the matters of
439 education, retirement and aging, and upon request shall give
440 written or oral opinions to the board in response to such
441 requests. As compensation for such duties the person shall
442 receive an amount based on the person's years of service so
443 that the total amount received pursuant to sections 169.010
444 to 169.141 shall be at least the minimum amounts specified
445 in subdivisions (1) to (4) of this subsection. In
446 determining the minimum amount to be received, the amounts
447 in subdivisions (3) and (4) of this subsection shall be
448 adjusted in accordance with the actuarial adjustment, if
449 any, that was applied to the person's retirement allowance.
450 In determining the minimum amount to be received, beginning
451 September 1, 1996, the amounts in subdivisions (1) and (2)
452 of this subsection shall be adjusted in accordance with the
453 actuarial adjustment, if any, that was applied to the
454 person's retirement allowance due to election of an optional
455 form of retirement having a continued monthly payment after
456 the person's death. Notwithstanding any other provision of
457 law to the contrary, no person retired before, on, or after
458 May 26, 1994, and no beneficiary of such a person, shall
459 receive a retirement benefit pursuant to sections 169.010 to
460 169.141 based on the person's years of service less than the
461 following amounts:

SB 1779 16
462 (1) Thirty or more years of service, one thousand two
463 hundred dollars;
464 (2) At least twenty-five years but less than thirty
465 years, one thousand dollars;
466 (3) At least twenty years but less than twenty-five
467 years, eight hundred dollars;
468 (4) At least fifteen years but less than twenty years,
469 six hundred dollars.
470 19. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the
471 contrary, any person retired prior to May 26, 1994, and any
472 designated beneficiary of such a retired member who was
473 deceased prior to July 1, 1999, shall be made, constituted,
474 appointed and employed by the board as a special consultant
475 on the matters of education, retirement or aging and upon
476 request shall give written or oral opinions to the board in
477 response to such requests. Beginning September 1, 1996, as
478 compensation for such service, the member shall have added,
479 pursuant to this subsection, to the member's monthly annuity
480 as provided by this section a dollar amount equal to the
481 lesser of sixty dollars or the product of two dollars
482 multiplied by the member's number of years of creditable
483 service. Beginning September 1, 1999, the designated
484 beneficiary of the deceased member shall as compensation for
485 such service have added, pursuant to this subsection, to the
486 monthly annuity as provided by this section a dollar amount
487 equal to the lesser of sixty dollars or the product of two
488 dollars multiplied by the member's number of years of
489 creditable service. The total compensation provided by this
490 section including the compensation provided by this
491 subsection shall be used in calculating any future cost-of-
492 living adjustments provided by subsection 13 of this section.

SB 1779 17
493 20. Any member who has retired prior to July 1, 1998,
494 and the designated beneficiary of a deceased retired member
495 shall be made, constituted, appointed and employed by the
496 board as a special consultant on the matters of education,
497 retirement and aging, and upon request shall give written or
498 oral opinions to the board in response to such requests. As
499 compensation for such duties the person shall receive a
500 payment equivalent to eight and seven-tenths percent of the
501 previous month's benefit, which shall be added to the
502 member's or beneficiary's monthly annuity and which shall
503 not be subject to the provisions of subsections 13 and 14 of
504 this section for the purposes of the limit on the total
505 amount of increases which may be received.
506 21. Any member who has retired shall be made,
507 constituted, appointed and employed by the board as a
508 special consultant on the matters of education, retirement
509 and aging, and upon request shall give written or oral
510 opinions to the board in response to such request. As
511 compensation for such duties, the beneficiary of the retired
512 member, or, if there is no beneficiary, the surviving
513 spouse, surviving children in equal shares, surviving
514 parents in equal shares, or estate of the retired member, in
515 that order of precedence, shall receive as a part of
516 compensation for these duties a death benefit of five
517 thousand dollars.
518 22. Any member who has retired prior to July 1, 1999,
519 and the designated beneficiary of a retired member who was
520 deceased prior to July 1, 1999, shall be made, constituted,
521 appointed and employed by the board as a special consultant
522 on the matters of education, retirement and aging, and upon
523 request shall give written or oral opinions to the board in
524 response to such requests. As compensation for such duties,

SB 1779 18
525 the person shall have added, pursuant to this subsection, to
526 the monthly annuity as provided by this section a dollar
527 amount equal to five dollars times the member's number of
528 years of creditable service.
529 23. Any member who has retired prior to July 1, 2000,
530 and the designated beneficiary of a deceased retired member
531 shall be made, constituted, appointed and employed by the
532 board as a special consultant on the matters of education,
533 retirement and aging, and upon request shall give written or
534 oral opinions to the board in response to such requests. As
535 compensation for such duties, the person shall receive a
536 payment equivalent to three and five-tenths percent of the
537 previous month's benefit, which shall be added to the member
538 or beneficiary's monthly annuity and which shall not be
539 subject to the provisions of subsections 13 and 14 of this
540 section for the purposes of the limit on the total amount of
541 increases which may be received.
542 24. Any member who has retired prior to July 1, 2001,
543 and the designated beneficiary of a deceased retired member
544 shall be made, constituted, appointed and employed by the
545 board as a special consultant on the matters of education,
546 retirement and aging, and upon request shall give written or
547 oral opinions to the board in response to such requests. As
548 compensation for such duties, the person shall receive a
549 dollar amount equal to three dollars times the member's
550 number of years of creditable service, which shall be added
551 to the member's or beneficiary's monthly annuity and which
552 shall not be subject to the provisions of subsections 13 and
553 14 of this section for the purposes of the limit on the
554 total amount of increases which may be received.
1 169.670. 1. The retirement allowance of a member
2 whose age at retirement is sixty years or more and whose

SB 1779 19
3 creditable service is five years or more, or whose sum of
4 age and creditable service equals eighty years or more, or
5 whose creditable service is thirty years or more regardless
6 of age, shall be the sum of the following items:
7 (1) For each year of membership service, one and sixty-
8 one hundredths percent of the member's final average salary;
9 (2) Six-tenths of the amount payable for a year of
10 membership service for each year of prior service;
11 (3) Eighty-five one-hundredths of one percent of any
12 amount by which the member's average compensation for
13 services rendered prior to July 1, 1973, exceeds the average
14 monthly compensation on which federal Social Security taxes
15 were paid during the period over which such average
16 compensation was computed, for each year of membership
17 service credit for services rendered prior to July 1, 1973,
18 plus six-tenths of the amount payable for a year of
19 membership service for each year of prior service credit;
20 (4) In lieu of the retirement allowance otherwise
21 provided by subdivisions (1) to (3) of this subsection, a
22 member may elect to receive a retirement allowance of:
23 (a) One and fifty-nine hundredths percent of the
24 member's final average salary for each year of membership
25 service, if the member's creditable service is twenty-nine
26 years or more but less than thirty years and the member has
27 not attained the age of fifty-five;
28 (b) One and fifty-seven hundredths percent of the
29 member's final average salary for each year of membership
30 service, if the member's creditable service is twenty-eight
31 years or more but less than twenty-nine years, and the
32 member has not attained the age of fifty-five;
33 (c) One and fifty-five hundredths percent of the
34 member's final average salary for each year of membership

SB 1779 20
35 service, if the member's creditable service is twenty-seven
36 years or more but less than twenty-eight years and the
37 member has not attained the age of fifty-five;
38 (d) One and fifty-three hundredths percent of the
39 member's final average salary for each year of membership
40 service, if the member's creditable service is twenty-six
41 years or more but less than twenty-seven years and the
42 member has not attained the age of fifty-five;
43 (e) One and fifty-one hundredths percent of the
44 member's final average salary for each year of membership
45 service, if the member's creditable service is twenty-five
46 years or more but less than twenty-six years and the member
47 has not attained the age of fifty-five; and
48 (5) In addition to the retirement allowance provided
49 in subdivisions (1) to (3) of this subsection, a member
50 retiring on or after July 1, 2001, whose creditable service
51 is thirty years or more or whose sum of age and creditable
52 service is eighty years or more, shall receive a temporary
53 retirement allowance equivalent to eight-tenths of one
54 percent of the member's final average salary multiplied by
55 the member's years of service until such time as the member
56 reaches the minimum age for Social Security retirement
57 benefits.
58 2. (1) If the board of trustees determines that the
59 cost of living, as measured by generally accepted standards,
60 increases five percent or more in the preceding fiscal year,
61 the board shall increase the retirement allowances which the
62 retired members or beneficiaries are receiving by five
63 percent of the amount being received by the retired member
64 or the beneficiary at the time the annual increase is
65 granted by the board; provided that, the increase provided
66 in this subsection shall not become effective until the

SB 1779 21
67 fourth January first following a member's retirement or
68 January 1, 1982, whichever occurs later, and the total of
69 the increases granted to a retired member or the beneficiary
70 after December 31, 1981, may not exceed eighty percent of
71 the retirement allowance established at retirement or as
72 previously adjusted by other provisions of law.
73 (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
74 chapter to the contrary, the limitation on the total of the
75 increases granted to a retired member or beneficiary as
76 provided by subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
77 subject to an annual increase approved by the board of
78 trustees beginning on December 31, 2026, and on each
79 December thirty-first thereafter, except that such annual
80 increase shall not exceed two percent per year. Any
81 increase to the limitation shall depend on the performance
82 of the system's investments. If the system's investments
83 earn two percent or greater returns in excess of the
84 investment return rate adopted by the board of trustees in
85 the immediately prior fiscal year, the percentage of the
86 retirement allowance for the total of increases granted to a
87 retired member or beneficiary shall be increased by two
88 percent. The two percent increase shall be incorporated in
89 the calculation applicable to the retirement allowances in
90 the calendar year that immediately follows the fiscal year
91 in which the system's investments met or exceeded by two
92 percent the investment return rate. The total of the
93 increases granted to a retired member or beneficiary shall
94 not exceed eighty percent of the retirement allowance
95 established at retirement or as previously adjusted by other
96 sections. If a retired member or beneficiary has already
97 reached the eighty percent cap under this subdivision, such
98 retired member or beneficiary shall be granted a two percent

SB 1779 22
99 cost of living adjustment for such year, but such increases
100 shall not be cumulative. In a year that the system's
101 investments fail to earn at least two percent returns in
102 excess of the investment return rate adopted by the board of
103 trustees in the immediately prior fiscal year, the retired
104 member or beneficiary that has already reached the eighty
105 percent cap under this subdivision shall not be granted a
106 cost of living adjustment for that year. The percentage of
107 the retirement allowance for the total of increases granted
108 to a retired member or beneficiary shall not be decreased.
109 Any reference to the limitation on the total of increases
110 granted to a retired member or beneficiary in any other
111 section of this chapter shall be construed to be the
112 percentage of the retirement allowance in effect as
113 increased pursuant to this subdivision unless such increase
114 to the percentage of the retirement allowance is otherwise
115 expressly excluded.
116 (3) If the cost of living increases less than five
117 percent, the board of trustees may determine the percentage
118 of increase to be made in retirement allowances, but at no
119 time can the increase exceed five percent per year. If the
120 cost of living decreases in a fiscal year, there will be no
121 increase in allowances for retired members on the following
122 January first.
123 3. The board of trustees may reduce the amounts which
124 have been granted as increases to a member pursuant to
125 subsection 2 of this section if the cost of living, as
126 determined by the board and as measured by generally
127 accepted standards, is less than the cost of living was at
128 the time of the first increase granted to the member;
129 provided that, the reductions shall not exceed the amount of

SB 1779 23
130 increases which have been made to the member's allowance
131 after December 31, 1981.
132 4. (1) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided
133 in subsection 1 of this section, called option 1, a member
134 whose creditable service is twenty-five years or more or who
135 has attained age fifty-five with five or more years of
136 creditable service may elect, in the application for
137 retirement, to receive the actuarial equivalent of the
138 member's retirement allowance in reduced monthly payments
139 for life during retirement with the provision that:
140 Option 2.
141 Upon the member's death, the reduced retirement
142 allowance shall be continued throughout the life of and paid
143 to such person as has an insurable interest in the life of
144 the member as the member shall have nominated in the
145 member's election of the option, and provided further that
146 if the person so nominated dies before the retired member,
147 the retirement allowance will be increased to the amount the
148 retired member would be receiving had the member elected
149 option 1; or
150 Option 3.
151 Upon the death of the member three-fourths of the
152 reduced retirement allowance shall be continued throughout
153 the life of and paid to such person as has an insurable
154 interest in the life of the member and as the member shall
155 have nominated in an election of the option, and provided
156 further that if the person so nominated dies before the
157 retired member, the retirement allowance will be increased
158 to the amount the retired member would be receiving had the
159 member elected option 1; or
160 Option 4.

SB 1779 24
161 Upon the death of the member one-half of the reduced
162 retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life
163 of, and paid to, such person as has an insurable interest in
164 the life of the member and as the member shall have
165 nominated in an election of the option, and provided further
166 that if the person so nominated dies before the retired
167 member, the retirement allowance shall be increased to the
168 amount the retired member would be receiving had the member
169 elected option 1; or
170 Option 5.
171 Upon the death of the member prior to the member having
172 received one hundred twenty monthly payments of the member's
173 reduced allowance, the remainder of the one hundred twenty
174 monthly payments of the reduced allowance shall be paid to
175 such beneficiary as the member shall have nominated in the
176 member's election of the option or in a subsequent
177 nomination. If there is no beneficiary so nominated who
178 survives the member for the remainder of the one hundred
179 twenty monthly payments, the reserve for the remainder of
180 such one hundred twenty monthly payments shall be paid to
181 the surviving spouse, surviving children in equal shares,
182 surviving parents in equal shares, or estate of the last
183 person, in that order of precedence, to receive a monthly
184 allowance in a lump sum payment. If the total of the one
185 hundred twenty payments paid to the retired individual and
186 the beneficiary of the retired individual is less than the
187 total of the member's accumulated contributions, the
188 difference shall be paid to the beneficiary in a lump sum; or
189 Option 6.
190 Upon the death of the member prior to the member having
191 received sixty monthly payments of the member's reduced
192 allowance, the remainder of the sixty monthly payments of

SB 1779 25
193 the reduced allowance shall be paid to such beneficiary as
194 the member shall have nominated in the member's election of
195 the option or in a subsequent nomination. If there is no
196 beneficiary so nominated who survives the member for the
197 remainder of the sixty monthly payments, the reserve for the
198 remainder of such sixty monthly payments shall be paid to
199 the surviving spouse, surviving children in equal shares,
200 surviving parents in equal shares, or estate of the last
201 person, in that order of precedence, to receive a monthly
202 allowance in a lump sum payment. If the total of the sixty
203 payments paid to the retired individual and the beneficiary
204 of the retired individual is less than the total of the
205 member's accumulated contributions, the difference shall be
206 paid to the beneficiary in a lump sum; or
207 Option 7.
208 A plan of variable monthly benefit payments which
209 provides, in conjunction with the member's retirement
210 benefits under the federal Social Security laws, level or
211 near-level retirement benefit payments to the member for
212 life during retirement, and if authorized, to an appropriate
213 beneficiary designated by the member. Such a plan shall be
214 actuarially equivalent to the retirement allowance under
215 option 1 and shall be available for election only if
216 established by the board of trustees under duly adopted
217 rules.
218 (2) The election of an option may be made only in the
219 application for retirement and such application must be
220 filed prior to the date on which the retirement of the
221 member is to be effective. If either the member or the
222 person nominated dies before the effective date of
223 retirement, the option shall not be effective, provided that:

SB 1779 26
224 (a) If the member or a person retired on disability
225 retirement dies after attaining age fifty-five and acquiring
226 five or more years of creditable service or after acquiring
227 twenty-five or more years of creditable service and before
228 retirement, except retirement with disability benefits, and
229 the person named by the member as the member's beneficiary
230 has an insurable interest in the life of the deceased
231 member, the designated beneficiary may elect to receive
232 either survivorship payments under option 2 or a payment of
233 the member's accumulated contributions. If survivorship
234 benefits under option 2 are elected and the member at the
235 time of death would have been eligible to receive an
236 actuarial equivalent of the member's retirement allowance,
237 the designated beneficiary may further elect to defer the
238 option 2 payments until the date the member would have been
239 eligible to receive the retirement allowance provided in
240 subsection 1 of this section.
241 (b) If the member or a person retired on disability
242 retirement dies before attaining age fifty-five but after
243 acquiring five but fewer than twenty-five years of
244 creditable service, and the person named as the beneficiary
245 has an insurable interest in the life of the deceased member
246 or disability retiree, the designated beneficiary may elect
247 to receive either a payment of the person's accumulated
248 contributions or survivorship benefits under option 2 to
249 begin on the date the member would first have been eligible
250 to receive an actuarial equivalent of the person's
251 retirement allowance, or to begin on the date the member
252 would first have been eligible to receive the retirement
253 allowance provided in subsection 1 of this section.
254 5. If the total of the retirement or disability
255 allowances paid to an individual before the person's death

SB 1779 27
256 is less than the person's accumulated contributions at the
257 time of the person's retirement, the difference shall be
258 paid to the person's beneficiary or, if there is no
259 beneficiary, to the surviving spouse, surviving children in
260 equal shares, surviving parents in equal shares, or person's
261 estate, in that order of precedence; provided, however, that
262 if an optional benefit, as provided in option 2, 3 or 4 in
263 subsection 4 of this section, had been elected and the
264 beneficiary dies after receiving the optional benefit, then,
265 if the total retirement allowances paid to the retired
266 individual and the individual's beneficiary are less than
267 the total of the contributions, the difference shall be paid
268 to the surviving spouse, surviving children in equal shares,
269 surviving parents in equal shares, or estate of the
270 beneficiary, in that order of precedence, unless the retired
271 individual designates a different recipient with the board
272 at or after retirement.
273 6. If a member dies and his or her financial
274 institution is unable to accept the final payment or
275 payments due to the member, the final payment or payments
276 shall be paid to the beneficiary of the member or, if there
277 is no beneficiary, to the surviving spouse, surviving
278 children in equal shares, surviving parents in equal shares,
279 or estate of the member, in that order of precedence, unless
280 otherwise stated. If the beneficiary of a deceased member
281 dies and his or her financial institution is unable to
282 accept the final payment or payments, the final payment or
283 payments shall be paid to the surviving spouse, surviving
284 children in equal shares, surviving parents in equal shares,
285 or estate of the member, in that order of precedence, unless
286 otherwise stated.

SB 1779 28
287 7. If a member dies before receiving a retirement
288 allowance, the member's accumulated contributions at the
289 time of the member's death shall be paid to the member's
290 beneficiary or, if there is no beneficiary, to the surviving
291 spouse, surviving children in equal shares, surviving
292 parents in equal shares, or to the member's estate;
293 provided, however, that no such payment shall be made if the
294 beneficiary elects option 2 in subsection 4 of this section,
295 unless the beneficiary dies before having received benefits
296 pursuant to that subsection equal to the accumulated
297 contributions of the member, in which case the amount of
298 accumulated contributions in excess of the total benefits
299 paid pursuant to that subsection shall be paid to the
300 surviving spouse, surviving children in equal shares,
301 surviving parents in equal shares, or estate of the
302 beneficiary, in that order of precedence.
303 8. If a member ceases to be an employee as defined in
304 section 169.600 and certifies to the board of trustees that
305 such cessation is permanent or if the person's membership is
306 otherwise terminated, the person shall be paid the person's
307 accumulated contributions with interest.
308 9. Notwithstanding any provisions of sections 169.600
309 to 169.715 to the contrary, if a member ceases to be an
310 employee as defined in section 169.600 after acquiring five
311 or more years of creditable service, the member may, at the
312 option of the member, leave the member's contributions with
313 the retirement system and claim a retirement allowance any
314 time after the member reaches the minimum age for voluntary
315 retirement. When the member's claim is presented to the
316 board, the member shall be granted an allowance as provided
317 in sections 169.600 to 169.715 on the basis of the member's
318 age and years of service.

SB 1779 29
319 10. The retirement allowance of a member retired
320 because of disability shall be nine-tenths of the allowance
321 to which the member's creditable service would entitle the
322 member if the member's age were sixty.
323 11. Notwithstanding any provisions of sections 169.600
324 to 169.715 to the contrary, any member who is a member prior
325 to October 13, 1969, may elect to have the member's
326 retirement allowance computed in accordance with sections
327 169.600 to 169.715 as they existed prior to October 13, 1969.
328 12. Any application for retirement shall include a
329 sworn statement by the member certifying that the spouse of
330 the member at the time the application was completed was
331 aware of the application and the plan of retirement elected
332 in the application.
333 13. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
334 person retired prior to August 14, 1984, who is receiving a
335 reduced retirement allowance under option 1 or 2 of
336 subsection 4 of this section, as the option existed prior to
337 August 14, 1984, and whose beneficiary nominated to receive
338 continued retirement allowance payments under the elected
339 option dies or has died, shall upon application to the board
340 of trustees have the person's retirement allowance increased
341 to the amount the person would have been receiving had the
342 person not elected the option actuarially adjusted to
343 recognize any excessive benefits which would have been paid
344 to the person up to the time of the application.
345 14. Benefits paid pursuant to the provisions of the
346 public education employee retirement system of Missouri
347 shall not exceed the limitations of Section 415 of Title 26
348 of the United States Code, except as provided under this
349 subsection. Notwithstanding any other law, the board of
350 trustees may establish a benefit plan under Section 415(m)

SB 1779 30
351 of Title 26 of the United States Code. Such plan shall be
352 credited solely for the purpose described in Section
353 415(m)(3)(A) of Title 26 of the United States Code. The
354 board of trustees may promulgate regulations necessary to
355 implement the provisions of this subsection and to create
356 and administer such benefit plan.
357 15. Any member who has retired prior to July 1, 1999,
358 and the designated beneficiary of a deceased retired member
359 upon request shall be made, constituted, appointed and
360 employed by the board as a special consultant on the matters
361 of education, retirement and aging. As compensation for
362 such duties the person shall receive a payment equivalent to
363 seven and four-tenths percent of the previous month's
364 benefit, which shall be added to the member's or
365 beneficiary's monthly annuity and which shall not be subject
366 to the provisions of subsections 2 and 3 of this section for
367 the purposes of the limit on the total amount of increases
368 which may be received.
369 16. Any member who has retired prior to July 1, 2000,
370 and the designated beneficiary of a deceased retired member
371 upon request shall be made, constituted, appointed and
372 employed by the board as a special consultant on the matters
373 of education, retirement and aging. As compensation for
374 such duties the person shall receive a payment equivalent to
375 three and four-tenths percent of the previous month's
376 benefit, which shall be added to the member's or
377 beneficiary's monthly annuity and which shall not be subject
378 to the provisions of subsections 2 and 3 of this section for
379 the purposes of the limit on the total amount of increases
380 which may be received.
381 17. Any member who has retired prior to July 1, 2001,
382 and the designated beneficiary of a deceased retired member

SB 1779 31
383 upon request shall be made, constituted, appointed and
384 employed by the board as a special consultant on the matters
385 of education, retirement and aging. As compensation for
386 such duties the person shall receive a payment equivalent to
387 seven and one-tenth percent of the previous month's benefit,
388 which shall be added to the member's or beneficiary's
389 monthly annuity and which shall not be subject to the
390 provisions of subsections 2 and 3 of this section for the
391 purposes of the limit on the total amount of increases which
392 may be received.
✓